District of Columbia statutes.
16-2101

Definition of joint and several contracts.

For the purposes of action thereon, a contract or obligation entered into by two or more persons, whether:

(1)

the persons are partners or joint contractors;

(2)

the contract is under seal or not;

(3)

it is written or verbal; or

(4)

it is expressed to be joint and several or not —

is deemed to be joint and several.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 585, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1973 Ed., § 16-2101.
1981 Ed., § 16-2101.
This section is referenced in § 16-2102 and § 16-2103.